apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
    <pardef n="/ہونا__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونگے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونگی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونگے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوگی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونگی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونیوالا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونے والے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونےوالی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونےوالی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہونے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>بولے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہو</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہو</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہو</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوتا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوتے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوتی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوتی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوکر</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوکے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوا</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئے</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>حیی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئی</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہییں</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ہوئیں</l><r>ہونا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="ہونا"><i></i><par n="/ہونا__vblex_iv"/></e>
